Washington statutes.
RCW 43.89.030

Connection with and participation in network by political subdivisions.

Any city, county, city and county, or other public agency may connect with and participate in the teletypewriter communications network subject to the rules, regulations, procedures and methods of operation adopted by the state communications advisory committee: PROVIDED, That such city, county, city and county, or other public agency shall first agree to pay such installation charges as may be necessary for such connection and such monthly operational charges as may be established by the chief of the Washington state patrol.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 60 s 4; 1965 c 8 s 43.89.030. Prior: 1963 c 160 s 3.]